Mississippi, session 2026, HB1649.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  During fiscal year 2027, the State Treasurer, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, shall transfer to the Capital Expense Fund out of the following enumerated funds, the amounts listed below from each fund: FUND                       FUND NUMBER             AMOUNT General Fund 2999000000               $1.00 Treasurer's Office Abandoned Property 3317800000              $1.00 TOTAL                                               $2.00 SECTION 2. Upon the effective date of this act, the State Fiscal Officer shall transfer the sum of Nine Million Eight Hundred Twenty-one Thousand Three Hundred Twenty-eight Dollars ($9,821,328.00) from the Capital Expense Fund (Fund No. 6499C00000) to the Mississippi Main Street Revitalization Grant Fund (Fund No. 661416000). SECTION 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.